Hawaii statutes.
§651-38 Alias writs. Any circuit
court, out of which an execution has been issued, if such execution has been
returned unsatisfied wholly or in part, may issue an alias execution to the
same circuit, or an execution leviable in some other circuit, for the
satisfaction of the unpaid remainder of the judgment and additional costs,
expenses, and commissions, which alias or testatum writ of execution shall be
served in like manner as the original. [CC 1859, §1030; RL 1925, §2442; RL
1935, §4141; RL 1945, §10168; RL 1955, §233-37; HRS §651-38]

Case Notes

Alias execution allowed when original execution issued by
mistake for too small an amount. 10 H. 348 (1896).

Alias execution issued after dismissal of appeal may be good
even if original bad. 15 H. 486 (1904).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next